Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE B. HEALTH PROGRAMS

CHAPTER 40. EPILEPSY

Sec. 40.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "epilepsy" means a variable symptom complex characterized by recurrent paroxysmal attacks of unconsciousness or impaired consciousness, usually with a succession of clonic or tonic muscular spasms or other abnormal behavior.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 40.002. EPILEPSY PROGRAM. The department, with approval of the executive commissioner, may establish an epilepsy program to provide diagnostic services, treatment, and support services to eligible persons who have epilepsy.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0133, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 40.003. RULES. The executive commissioner may adopt rules the executive commissioner considers necessary to define the scope of the epilepsy program and the medical and financial standards for eligibility.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0134, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 40.004. ADMINISTRATION. (a) The commissioner, with the approval of the executive commissioner, may appoint an administrator to carry out the epilepsy program.

(b) The administrator shall report to and be under the direction of the commissioner.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0135, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 40.005. FEES. Program patients may be charged a fee for services according to rules adopted by the executive commissioner.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.0136, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 40.006. FUNDING. The department may seek, receive, and spend any funds received through appropriations, grants, or donations from public or private sources for the purposes of the epilepsy program.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

Sec. 40.007. CONTRACTS. The department may enter into contracts or other agreements it considers necessary to facilitate the provision of services under this chapter, including contracts with other departments, agencies, boards, educational institutions, individuals, county governments, municipal governments, states, and the United States.

Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 678, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.